Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-939
Division of Adult Services; duties.

The Division of Adult Services shall:

(1) Establish, administer, and supervise all correctional facilities designed to house adult offenders;

(2) Establish and maintain the Adult Diagnostic and Evaluation Services Program;

(3) Develop and coordinate with the assistance of the Division of Community-Centered Services, volunteer programs within adult correctional facilities; and

(4) Perform any other duties assigned by the Director of Correctional Services.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 481, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 81.